District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1410

Financial affairs.

Repealed.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 11, 41 DCR 4636
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-115, § 2, 45 DCR 1957
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1602, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181
1981 Ed., § 2-4010.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Real Property Tax Rates for Tax Year 1996 Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-86, February 10, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 1312).

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Sports and Entertainment Commission Financial Affairs Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-72, February 25, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3364).

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1502 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Sports and Entertainment Commission Financial Affairs Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-173, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9177).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-1401.